Georgia, session 2025_26, HB748.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act placing the coroner of Carroll County on an annual salary, approved April 17, 1973
(Ga. L. 1973, p. 2924), as amended, particularly by an Act approved April 4, 1997 (Ga. L.
1997, p. 3716), is amended by revising Section 2 as follows:
"SECTION 2.
The coroner of Carroll County shall receive an annual base salary of $43,620.00, payable
monthly from county funds. The coroner shall also receive an expense allowance of
$3,100.00 per year, payable monthly from county funds under such conditions as the county
H. B. 748
- 1 -

LC 44 3126/AP
governing authority may provide. The amounts set forth in this section shall be subject to
annual adjustments as provided for under O.C.G.A. Section 36-5-28."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 748
- 2 -